Hawaii statutes.
§431:9B-102 Licensure. (a) Persons,
firms, associations, and corporations acting as a reinsurance
intermediary-broker in this State shall maintain a license as a reinsurance
intermediary-broker in this State. The reinsurance intermediary-broker shall maintain
a license in every state where it maintains an office, either directly, as a
member or employee of a firm or association, or as an officer, director, or
employee of a corporation.

(b) Persons, firms, associations, and
corporations acting as a reinsurance intermediary-manager for a reinsurer
domiciled in this State shall maintain a license as a reinsurance
intermediary-manager in this State. A reinsurance intermediary-manager license
shall be required to act as a reinsurance intermediary-manager in this State
for a nondomestic reinsurer.

(c) The commissioner may require a reinsurance
intermediary-manager subject to subsection (b) to:

(1) File a bond from an insurance company licensed to
do business within the State or with an insurance company approved by the
commissioner in an amount equal to $500,000 or ten per cent of the annual
reinsurance premiums managed by the reinsurance intermediary-manager, whichever
is greater, except that the bond amount under this paragraph shall not exceed
$10,000,000, for the protection of the reinsurer;

(2) Maintain an errors and omissions policy, with an
insurance company licensed to do business within the State or with an insurance
company approved by the commissioner, in an amount equal to $250,000 or
twenty-five per cent of the annual reinsurance premiums managed by the
reinsurance intermediary-manager, whichever is greater, except that the policy
limits under this paragraph shall not exceed $10,000,000; and

(3) Provide any other report required by the commissioner.

At the commissioner's request, the reinsurance
intermediary-manager shall provide the commissioner with proof of the bond and
the policy, and appropriate documentation to show that the bond and the policy
continue to be in effect or that a new bond and a new policy have been secured.

(d)(1) The commissioner may issue a reinsurance
intermediary license to any person, firm, association, or corporation that has
complied with the requirements of this article. Any such license issued to a
firm or association shall authorize all the members of that firm or association
and any designated employees to act as reinsurance intermediaries under the
license, and all those persons shall be named in the application and any
supplements thereto. Any such license issued to a corporation shall authorize
all of the officers, and any designated employees and directors thereof to act
as reinsurance intermediaries on behalf of the corporation, and all those
persons shall be named in the application and any supplements thereto.

(2) If the applicant for a reinsurance intermediary
license is a nonresident, the applicant, as a condition precedent to receiving
or holding a license, shall designate the commissioner as agent for service of
process in the manner, and with the same legal effect, provided for by this
article for service of process upon unauthorized insurers; and also shall
furnish the commissioner with the name and address of a resident of this State
upon whom notices or orders of the commissioner or process affecting the
nonresident reinsurance intermediary may be served. The licensee shall
promptly notify the commissioner in writing of every change in its designated
agent for service of process, and such change shall not become effective until
acknowledged by the commissioner.

(3) The commissioner shall issue a nonresident
reinsurance intermediary license if:

(A) The applicant is currently licensed as a
resident reinsurance intermediary or insurance producer pursuant to article 9A
and in good standing in the applicant's home state;

(B) The applicant has submitted the proper
request for licensure and paid the fees required by section 431:7-101;

(C) The applicant has submitted or transmitted
to the commissioner the application for licensure that the applicant submitted
to the applicant's home state, or in lieu of the same, a completed uniform
application; and

(D) The person's home state awards nonresident
licenses to residents of this State on the same basis.

(e) The commissioner may refuse to issue a
reinsurance intermediary license if, in the commissioner's judgment, the
applicant, anyone named on the application, or any member, principal, officer,
or director of the applicant, is not trustworthy, or that any controlling
person of the applicant is not trustworthy to act as a reinsurance
intermediary, or that any of the foregoing has given cause for revocation or
suspension of such license, or has failed to comply with any prerequisite for
the issuance of the license. Upon written request therefor, the commissioner
shall furnish a summary of the basis for refusal to issue a license, which
document shall be privileged and not subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter
92F.

(f) Licensed attorneys at law of this State
when acting in their professional capacity as such shall be exempt from this
section.

(g) Licensing procedure, duration, and related
matters affecting reinsurance intermediaries shall be governed by articles 7
and 9A. [L 1992, c 176, pt of §6; am L 2001, c 136, §2; am L 2004, c
122, §29; am L 2006, c 189, §6; am L 2012, c 66, §11]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next